Hawaii, session 2026, HB1338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established a homelessness sanctuary pilot program to provide a safe location on public lands for homeless individuals and families.  The program shall be administered by the governor's coordinator on homelessness in coordination with the department of human services and the city and county of Honolulu. (b)  No later than November 1, 2025, the governor's coordinator on homelessness shall designate a specific location on state or county land for the homelessness sanctuary pilot program.  The state or county agency having jurisdiction over the land shall work with the governor's coordinator on homelessness to: (1)  Ensure that the location has sufficient infrastructure to support the pilot program; and (2)  Minimize adverse impacts to the environment, including to nearshore resources such as corals, reef fish, and seabirds. (c)  The location designated by the State and city and county of Honolulu pursuant to subsection (b) shall serve as a safe location for homeless individuals and families to reside and access services.  The governor's coordinator on homelessness, department of human services, and city and county of Honolulu shall: (1)  Open the location for habitation and provision of services no later than January 1, 2026; (2)  Coordinate to provide the following facilities at the designated location: (A)  A central tent for shelter; (B)  A parking area at which residents may: (i)  Park their vehicles; and (ii)  Sleep in their vehicles, if the residents choose to do so; (C)  Restroom and shower facilities; (D)  Lockers and storage space; (E)  Laundry facilities; and (F)  Solid waste collection and disposal; (3)  Allow for residents to set up additional, individual tents as needed by the residents; (4)  Partner with nonprofit organizations and other entities to provide at least one meal per day to each resident; (5)  Allow residents to be accompanied by pet animals; (6)  Establish volunteer and employment opportunities for residents; provided that: (A)  Residents employed under this paragraph shall be paid not less than the minimum wage; and (B)  Volunteer and employment opportunities, to the extent possible, shall focus on clean-up activities, vegetation control, painting, and other tasks for which the state and county governments are experiencing a backlog; and (7)  To the extent possible, establish a zero-tolerance policy for illegal drugs, violence, and obscenities. (d)  The governor's coordinator on homelessness shall survey residents to determine other facilities and services that residents need or desire, including: (1)  Workshop areas for job training; (2)  Education opportunities; (3)  Gardening; (4)  Childcare to allow residents with children to seek and maintain employment; (5)  Transportation for children to attend school; and (6)  Transportation for residents to access bus and rail services that allow residents to more easily access their places of employment. Subject to available funds, the governor's coordinator on homelessness and the coordinator's partner agencies may offer facilities and services identified by residents as high priority needs or desires under this subsection. (e)  The state homelessness coordinator may contract with qualified churches, nonprofit organizations, businesses, and other entities pursuant to chapter 103D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the purposes of this Act. (f)  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026, 2027, and 2028, the governor's coordinator on homelessness shall submit a report to the legislature that includes: (1)  Progress the State and city and county of Honolulu have made in establishing the homelessness sanctuary pilot program; (2)  The number of homeless individuals and families served by the program; (3)  An evaluation of the homelessness sanctuary pilot program to determine whether the objectives of the program have been met or exceeded; (4)  An assessment of the impact of the homelessness sanctuary pilot program on the homelessness problem in Hawaii; (5)  An accounting of the expenditure of moneys appropriated by this Act, including a summary of any contracts entered into pursuant to subsection (e); (6)  A recommendation of whether the homelessness sanctuary pilot program should be made permanent; and (7)  Any other findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. (g)  The homelessness sanctuary pilot program shall cease to exist on December 31, 2027. (h)  As used in this section: "County" means the city and county of Honolulu. "Designated location" means the location on state or county land designated for the homelessness sanctuary pilot program pursuant to subsection (b). "Homeless" has the same meaning as in section 346-361, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Pet animal" has the same meaning as in section 711-1100, Hawaii Revised Statutes. "Resident" means a homeless person who lives at or receives services from the homelessness sanctuary pilot program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the homelessness sanctuary pilot program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act; provided that the appropriation made by this section shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided further that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2027, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the governor may transfer all or a portion of the appropriation in this section to other state or county agencies for expenditures incurred to implement the homelessness sanctuary pilot program. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________